Maine, session 132, LD774.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §1755 is enacted to read:
§1755. Bleeding control kits
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Bleeding control kit" means a first aid response kit that contains, at a minimum:
(1) A commercial grade tourniquet endorsed by a combat casualty care committee
under the United States Department of Defense;
(2) Wound-packing gauze;
(3) A compression bandage;
(4) A hemostatic dressing endorsed by a combat casualty care committee under the
United States Department of Defense;
(5) A pair of nonlatex gloves;
(6) A pair of scissors;
(7) A marker pen;
(8) Instructional documents on bleeding control developed by the United States
Department of Defense or by a nationally recognized professional medical
association for surgeons or a successor organization; and
(9) Any additional item that:
(a) Is approved by a law enforcement agency or emergency medical services
provider;
(b) Can adequately treat a traumatic injury; and
(c) Can be stored in a bleeding control kit.
B. "Department" means the Department of Administrative and Financial Services.
C. "State-owned building" means an occupied, nonresidential building owned or leased
by the State in which a person employed by the State performs job duties.
2. Bleeding control kits required. Beginning October 1, 2026, a state-owned building
must have one or more clearly visible, centrally located and easily accessible bleeding
control kits in a number adequate to service the population of the state-owned building at
maximum occupancy.
This subsection does not apply to a state-owned building that is vacant, under construction
or under renovation.
3. Inspection of bleeding control kits. A bleeding control kit must be inspected on a
regular basis. The inspection must include whether:
A. All required materials and supplies are present;
B. All materials and supplies are within their expiration dates; and
C. All materials and supplies are serviceable and in good condition.
Page 1 - 132LR1541(01)

Each bleeding control kit must contain an inspection log indicating the date of each
inspection, any deficiencies discovered by the inspection and the action, if any, taken to
address the deficiency.
4. Use of bleeding control kits. This section does not compel or require any person
to respond to an emergency or use a bleeding control kit. A person who, in good faith and
without compensation, renders emergency care with a bleeding control kit is not liable for
civil damages for any act or omission in using the bleeding control kit unless the act or
omission is grossly negligent or purposeful.
5. Bleeding Control Kit Fund. The Bleeding Control Kit Fund is established. The
fund is administered by the department to provide a grant to or to reimburse a school,
business or other organization that places a bleeding control kit on the school's, business's
or organization's premises or that makes available a bleeding control training program or a
similar program. The fund consists of appropriations, allocations or money received
through grants, gifts or donations from public or private sources. Funds in the fund do not
lapse but carry over to the next fiscal year. Interest from the fund accrues to the fund.
6. Rules. The department may adopt rules to implement this section. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules pursuant to chapter 375, subchapter
2-A.
Sec. 2. Identification of state-owned buildings requiring placement of
bleeding control kits. By July 1, 2026, the Department of Administrative and Financial
Services, in consultation with the Department of Public Safety, Maine Emergency Medical
Services, shall identify the state-owned buildings requiring placement of bleeding control
kits, the order of priority of state-owned buildings for placement of bleeding control kits,
the number and locations for placement of bleeding control kits for each state-owned
building and a schedule for future placements of bleeding control kits. This section does
not apply to a state-owned building that is vacant, under construction or under renovation.
For purposes of this section, "bleeding control kit" has the same meaning as in the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 1755, subsection 1, paragraph A and "state-owned
building" has the same meaning as in Title 5, section 1755, subsection 1, paragraph C.